Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.305

Actions against firm license.

The board may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the license issued to a firm if at any time the firm does not meet the requirements of this chapter for licensing, or for any of the causes enumerated in RCW 18.04.295, or for any of the following additional causes:

(1) The revocation or suspension of the sole-practitioner's license or the revocation or suspension or refusal to renew the license of any partner, manager, member, or shareholder;

(2) The revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the license of the firm, or any partner, manager, member, or shareholder thereof, to practice public accounting in any other state or foreign jurisdiction for any cause other than failure to pay a fee or to meet the CPE requirements of the other state or foreign jurisdiction;

(3) Failure by a nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm to comply with the requirements of this chapter or board rule; or

(4) Failure of the firm to comply with the requirements of this chapter or board rule.

[ 2001 c 294 s 15; 1992 c 103 s 12; 1986 c 295 s 12; 1983 c 234 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 294: See note following RCW 18.04.015.